Wisconsin, session 2025, SB424.
do enact as follows:SB424,1Section 1. 118.19 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:118.19 (3) (a) No license to teach in any public school may be issued unless the applicant possesses a bachelor’s degree including such professional training as the department by rule requires, except as permitted under par. (b) and ss. 115.28 (17) (a), 118.191, 118.1915, 118.192, 118.193, 118.194, and 118.197. Notwithstanding s. 36.11 (16), no teacher preparatory program in this state may be approved by the state superintendent under s. 115.28 (7) (a), unless each student in the program is required to complete student teaching consisting of full days for a full semester or summer session following the daily schedule and semester or summer session calendar of the cooperating school or the equivalent, as determined by the state superintendent. No license to teach in any public school may be granted to an applicant who completed a professional training program outside this state unless the applicant completed student teaching consisting of full days for a full semester or summer session following the daily schedule and semester or summer session calendar of the cooperating school or the equivalent, as determined by the state superintendent. The state superintendent may grant exceptions to the student teaching requirements under this paragraph when the midyear calendars of the institution offering the teacher preparatory program and the cooperating school differ from each other and would prevent students from attending classes at the institution in accordance with the institution’s calendar. The state superintendent shall promulgate rules to implement this subsection. If for the purpose of granting a license to teach or for approving a teacher preparatory program the state superintendent requires that an institution of higher education be accredited, the state superintendent shall accept accreditation by a regional or national institutional accrediting agency recognized by the U.S. department of education or by a programmatic accrediting organization. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb424 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb424 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB424 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB424 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB424: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting